Hawaii statutes.
[§346F-10] Enhanced rates to
medicaid managed care health plans. In accordance with title 42 Code of
Federal Regulations section 438, the department shall use revenues from the
nursing facility sustainability fee and federal matching funds to enhance the
capitated rates paid to medicaid managed care health plans for the state fiscal
year 2016-2017 consistent with the following objectives:

(1) The rate enhancement shall be used exclusively
for increasing reimbursements to private nursing facilities to support the
availability of services and to ensure access to care to the medicaid managed
care health plan enrollees;

(2) The rate enhancement shall be made part of the
monthly capitated rates by the department to medicaid managed care health
plans, which shall provide documentation to the department and the nursing
facility trade association located in Hawaii certifying that the revenues
received under paragraph (1) are used in accordance with this section;

(3) The rate enhancement shall be actuarially sound
and approved by the federal government for federal fund participation; and

(4) The department shall modify the fee-for-service
reimbursement rates of the nursing facilities to recognize the medicaid portion
of the nursing facility sustainability fee as an additional cost of serving
medicaid patients, and to provide a uniform percentage increase in preexisting
facility-specific rates. [L 2012, c 156, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013, c 142, §§2(3),
3; am L 2014, c 124, §§1(2), 2; am L 2015, c 69, §§1(3), 2; am L 2016, c 59, §1(2)]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next